Hawaii statutes.
[§489D-34] Rules. The commissioner may
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this chapter. [L 2006, c 153,
pt of §1]

Revision Note

Subsection designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15(1).

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next